District of Columbia statutes.
38-1909

Employment of substitutes — Authorized; compensation.

The Board of Education is hereby authorized to employ substitute teachers and attendance officers for service during the absence of any teacher or attendance officer on leave with pay or on leave without pay and to fix the rate of compensation to be paid such substitutes.

History

Oct. 13, 1949, 63 Stat. 843, ch. 686, § 6
Aug. 5, 1953, 67 Stat. 362, ch. 319, § 1
Aug. 5, 1955, 69 Stat. 530, ch. 569, title V, § 22
Oct. 2, 1972, 86 Stat. 760, Pub. L. 92-454, § 3

Cross References

Board of higher education, crediting of leave accumulated pursuant to this section, see § 38-1103.
Teachers’ retirement system coverage, see §§ 38-2021.08, 38-2021.13.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-1103.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1028.
1973 Ed., § 31-696.